Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-222
Applicability of sections; transfer of business; effect on agreements.

(1) Sections 53-201 to 53-223 shall apply to agreements in existence on April 18, 1989, and agreements entered into or renewed after such date.

(2) A transferee of a wholesaler that continues in business as a wholesaler shall have the benefit of and be bound by all terms and conditions of the agreement with the supplier in effect on the date of the transfer. A transfer of a wholesaler's business which requires the supplier's consent or approval but is disapproved by the supplier shall be null and void.

(3) A successor to a supplier that continues in business as a supplier shall be bound by all terms and conditions of each distribution agreement that the predecessor was a party to at the time of transfer with respect to each brand the successor continues to make available for sale in this state.

Laws 1989, LB 371, § 22.